Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 7. Notice of Rent Increase

38-12-701.
Notice of rent increase.

Notwithstanding any other law, in a nonresidential tenancy of one month or longer but less than six months in which there is no written agreement between the landlord and tenant, a landlord may increase the rent only upon at least twenty-one days’ notice to the tenant.

Notwithstanding any other law, in a residential tenancy in which there is no written agreement between the landlord and tenant, a landlord may increase the rent only upon at least sixty days’ written notice to the tenant.

A landlord may not terminate a residential tenancy in which there is no written agreement by serving a tenant with a notice to quit pursuant to section 13-40-107 with the primary purpose of increasing a tenant’s rent in a manner inconsistent with this section.

History.

Source:
L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-245), ch. 352, p. 1837, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1121), ch. 348, p. 2260, § 4, effective June 25.

38-12-702.
Limit on frequency of residential rent increases.

In residential tenancies, a landlord shall not increase rent more than one time in any twelve-month period of consecutive occupancy by the tenant, regardless of:

Whether there is a written rental agreement for the tenancy;

The length of the tenancy; and

Whether the tenant’s rental agreement is for a fixed tenancy, a month-to-month tenancy, or an indefinite term.

History.

Source:
L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1121), ch. 348, p. 2261, § 5, effective June 25.